District of Columbia statutes.
31-3759

Repealed

Remedies

Repealed.

Oct. 1, 1992, D.C. Law 9-170, § 12, 39 DCR 5825
For temporary (225 day) repeal of §§ 35-2601 to 35-2610 1981 Ed., see § 2 of Medicare Supplement Insurance Minimum Standard Temporary Act of 1992 (D.C. Law 9-133, July 22, 1992, law notification 39 DCR 5814).
1981 Ed., §§ 35-2601 to 35-2610.